SpellChecking/SpellCheckingTests/bin/Debug/Dictionaries/chuvash.aff
SFX B ĕ вĕмĕршĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]вĕ
SFX B ĕ кĕмĕршĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]кĕ
SFX B ĕ лĕмĕршĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]лĕ
SFX B ĕ мĕмĕршĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]мĕ
SFX B ĕ нĕмĕршĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]нĕ
SFX B ĕ пĕмĕршĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]пĕ
SFX B ĕ рĕмĕршĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]рĕ
SFX B ĕ сĕмĕршĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]сĕ
SFX B ĕ çĕмĕршĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]çĕ
SFX B ĕ тĕмĕршĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]тĕ
SFX B ĕ хĕмĕршĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]хĕ
SFX B ĕ чĕмĕршĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]чĕ
SFX B ĕ шĕмĕршĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]шĕ
SFX B 0 мшĕн/RT [^аеиуĕăӳэюя][вклмнпрсçтхчш]ĕ
SFX B 0 мĕршĕн/RT [^аеиуĕăӳэюя][вклмнпрсçтхчш]ĕ
SFX B 0 йĕмшĕн/RT и
SFX B 0 йĕмĕршĕн/RT и
SFX B 0 ӳшĕн/RT [^еĕиӳ]
SFX B 0 ĕршĕн/RT [^еĕиӳ]
SFX B е ӳшĕн/RT е
SFX B е ĕршĕн/RT е
SFX B ӳ ĕвӳшĕн/RT ӳ
SFX B ӳ ĕвĕршĕн/RT ӳ
SFX B ĕ вӳшĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]вĕ
SFX B ĕ кӳшĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]кĕ
SFX B ĕ лӳшĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]лĕ
SFX B ĕ мӳшĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]мĕ
SFX B ĕ нӳшĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]нĕ
SFX B ĕ пӳшĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]пĕ
SFX B ĕ рӳшĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]рĕ
SFX B ĕ сӳшĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]сĕ
SFX B ĕ çӳшĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]çĕ
SFX B ĕ тӳшĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]тĕ
SFX B ĕ хӳшĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]хĕ
SFX B ĕ чӳшĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]чĕ
SFX B ĕ шӳшĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]шĕ
SFX B ĕ вĕршĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]вĕ
SFX B ĕ кĕршĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]кĕ
SFX B ĕ лĕршĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]лĕ
SFX B ĕ мĕршĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]мĕ
SFX B ĕ нĕршĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]нĕ
SFX B ĕ пĕршĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]пĕ
SFX B ĕ рĕршĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]рĕ
SFX B ĕ сĕршĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]сĕ
SFX B ĕ çĕршĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]çĕ
SFX B ĕ тĕршĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]тĕ
SFX B ĕ хĕршĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]хĕ
SFX B ĕ чĕршĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]чĕ
SFX B ĕ шĕршĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]шĕ
SFX B ĕ ӳшĕн/RT [^аеиуĕăӳэюя][вклмнпрсçтхчш]ĕ
SFX B 0 ршĕн/RT [^аеиуĕăӳэюя][вклмнпрсçтхчш]ĕ
SFX B 0 йӳшĕн/RT и
SFX B 0 йĕршĕн/RT и
SFX B 0 ĕшĕн/RT [^еĕиӳт]
SFX B т чĕшĕн/RT т
SFX B е ишĕн/RT е
SFX B ӳ ĕвĕшĕн/RT ӳ
SFX B ĕ вишĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]вĕ
SFX B ĕ кишĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]кĕ
SFX B ĕ лишĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]лĕ
SFX B ĕ мишĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]мĕ
SFX B ĕ нишĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]нĕ
SFX B ĕ пишĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]пĕ
SFX B ĕ ришĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]рĕ
SFX B ĕ сишĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]сĕ
SFX B ĕ çишĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]çĕ
SFX B ĕ тишĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]тĕ
SFX B ĕ хишĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]хĕ
SFX B ĕ чишĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]чĕ
SFX B ĕ шишĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]шĕ
SFX B ĕ ишĕн/RT [^аеиуĕăӳэюя][вклмнпрсçтхчш]ĕ
SFX B 0 йĕшĕн/RT и

SFX C N 6
SFX C 0 ех [^е]
SFX C 0 х е
SFX C 0 рех .
SFX C 0 рехчĕ .
SFX C 0 терех .
SFX C 0 терехчĕ .

SFX D Y 12
SFX D 0 а .
SFX D 0 сăр .
SFX D 0 шăн .
SFX D 0 ăн .
SFX D 0 ăнскер .
SFX D 0 ăнни .
SFX D 0 шăнскер .
SFX D 0 ăн .
SFX D 0 ра .
SFX D 0 ран .
SFX D 0 па .
SFX D 0 пала .

SFX E Y 19
SFX E 0 скер .
SFX E 0 скерех .
SFX E 0 скерччĕ .
SFX E 0 рах [^р]
SFX E 0 рахчĕ [^р]
SFX E 0 ах р
SFX E 0 ахчĕ р
SFX E 0 тарах .
SFX E 0 тарахчĕ .
SFX E 0 ччĕ [вйлмнр]
SFX E 0 чĕ [кпсçтхчш]
SFX E 0 ччĕ [вйлмнр][еиĕӳ]
SFX E 0 чĕ [^аеиуĕăӳэюя][кпсçтхчш][ауăюя]
SFX E 0 ччĕ [аеиуĕăӳэюя][кпсçтхчш][ауăюя]
SFX E 0 ах [^аă]
SFX E 0 х а
SFX E ă ах ă
SFX E 0 ăн [^ăа]
SFX E 0 ки к

SFX F Y 19
SFX F 0 скер .
SFX F 0 скерех .
SFX F 0 скерччĕ .
SFX F 0 рех [^р]
SFX F 0 рехчĕ [^р]
SFX F 0 ех р
SFX F 0 ехчĕ р
SFX F 0 терех .
SFX F 0 терехчĕ .
SFX F 0 ччĕ [вйлмнр]
SFX F 0 чĕ [кпсçтхчш]
SFX F 0 ччĕ [вйлмнр][еиĕӳ]
SFX F 0 чĕ [^аеиуĕăӳэюя][кпсçтхчш][еиĕӳ]
SFX F 0 ччĕ [аеиуĕăӳэюя][кпсçтхчш][еиĕӳ]
SFX F 0 ех [^еĕ]
SFX F 0 х е
SFX F ĕ ех ĕ
SFX F 0 ĕн [^еĕ]
SFX F 0 ки к
