SpellChecking/SpellCheckingTests/bin/Debug/Dictionaries/chuvash.dic
çемĕ/B
çийлĕ/F
çирĕппĕн/C
çитлĕн/C
çурăмлă/E
çурилле/C
çӳллĕ/F
ăнăçуллă/E
ăрăмçах/E
ăруташлă/E
ăстăнлă/E
ăшпиллĕн/C
ĕççи/B
ĕçкĕлле/C
ĕçлĕн/C
ĕçлĕхлĕ/F
ĕçлĕхлĕн/C
ĕлккен/F
ĕмĕрлĕх/B
ĕмĕтлĕн/C
ĕмĕтсĕр/FB
ĕмпӳлле/C
ĕнĕлле/CG
ĕнелле/C
ĕненмелле/C
ĕнентерӳллĕ/F
ĕнентерӳллĕн/C
ĕненчĕклĕн/C
ĕненӳллĕн/C
ĕненӳсĕр/FB
ĕненӳсĕррĕн/C
ĕнер/B
ĕнчĕллĕ/F
ĕренкесĕр/F
ĕретлĕ/F
ĕретлĕн/C
ĕретрен/C
ĕрехетлĕн/C
ĕрчĕм/B
ĕрчевлĕ/F
ĕшеннĕн/C
ĕшенчĕклĕн/C
Айăмпи/B
Андалузи/B
Базель/B
Валиç/B
Гамби/B
Елеç/B
Еремен/B
Зеланди/B
Илтевер/B
Ирешке/B
Йăмапикке/B
Казань/B
Катри/B
Курмилле/B
Мĕтри/B
Матвей/B
Метийер/B
Михевер/B
Намиби/B
Пайкерей/B
Пермь/B
Пинемер/B
Питтелей/B
Прокофий/B
Сĕверпи/B
Савкантей/B
Салик/B
Сахварин/B
Сентĕр/B
Сертилет/B
Силпи/B
Сири/B
Суттер/B
Татянпи/B
Тимĕреç/B
Туймекеш/B
Тьăхти/B
Унтилет/B
Феодоси/B
Хакаси/B
Хураçтей/B
Шенкерей/B
Шуççи/B
Элтепи/B
Эрхиме/B
Ярославль/B
аçлăклă/E
абстракциллĕ/F
авăк/E
авалхилле/C
августчен/C
автобуслă/E
автомобилестроени/B
автономиллĕ/F
авторитарлă/E
агрессивлă/E
адыгелле/C
айкашуллă/E
академиллĕ/F
академилле/C
актуаллă/E
акци/B
аллегориллĕ/F
аллегорилле/CG
алмак/E
алтивĕççĕн/C
алчăравлă/E
амуници/B
аналогилле/C
анархиллĕ/F
анилинлă/E
ансамбльлĕ/F
антагонизмлă/E
апелляци/B
аппетитлă/E
аптăрашкилле/C
арçурилле/CG
аристократилле/C
аркатуллă/E
асăмлă/E
асапланни/B
асимметриллĕ/F
аслă/E
аслатилле/C
ассимиляцилле/CG
атмаллă/E
аттеллĕ/F
аудиенци/B
ахалĕн/C
ахаллĕн/C
ахальлĕн/C
ахальтен/C
ахальшĕн/C
ачаш/E
бактериле/CG
банкăллă/E
биографиллĕ/F
биркăллă/E
богослови/B
будкăллă/E
вăйпиттилен/C
вăлталлă/E
вăтам/E
вĕççĕн/C
вĕçкĕн/GB
вĕçкĕнĕн/C
вĕçкĕнчĕкле/C
вĕçлеке/FB
вĕлересле/C
вĕрентӳллĕ/F
вĕренӳ/B
вĕрилле/C
вĕтĕркке/F
вĕткеленчĕк/FB
вĕтхӳ/B
вĕчĕрхенчĕк/F
вĕчĕрхенӳллĕн/C
вĕшлеке/F
ваннăллă/E
вашăк/E
вегетаци/B
вексельлĕ/F
вестибюльлĕ/F
виçелĕх/B
виçеллĕн/C
вилĕмлĕ/F
вилĕмле/C
винаватлă/E
вирелле/C
вис/B
витĕмлĕ/F
витĕмлĕн/C
витерӳллĕн/C
вичкĕн/F
вичкĕннĕн/C
водитель/B
вуплă/E
вутпуççиллĕ/F
вылявлă/E
гайкăллă/E
гаранти/B
гастрольлĕ/F
гидроэнерги/B
госпитальлĕ/F
дачăллă/E
девальваци/B
дедукциллĕ/F
декольтеллĕ/F
демилитаризаци/B
диагональлĕ/F
дикци/B
динамикăллă/E
догмăллă/E
документаци/B
дрельлĕ/F
евĕккĕн/C
евĕрлĕ/C
евитлĕн/C
ейлеке/F
ейӳ/B
елпеке/F
епреме/FB
ермĕшĕн/C
етĕрне/B
ешĕл/F
заказлă/E
заняти/B
идиомăллă/E
иерархилле/C
извеçлĕ/F
издели/B
иккĕленчĕк/F
иккĕленчĕклĕн/C
иккĕлле/C
иккĕн/C
илĕртӳллĕ/F
илемлĕн/C
илемсĕр/B
иллюминациллĕ/F
именнĕн/C
именӳллĕ/F
именӳллĕн/C
имшер/F
имшерлĕх/B
индукциллĕ/F
индустриле/CG
инструкци/B
инструкциллĕ/F
интернационаллă/E
инфрахĕрлĕ/F
ирçĕ/B
ирĕккĕн/C
ирĕклĕреххĕн/C
ирĕксĕртен/C
ирĕшлĕ/F
иронилле/C
ирсĕррĕн/C
истери/B
истерикăллă/F
йăкăлти/F
йăлăм/AE
йăлтăра/E
йăмшак/E
йăпăлтилле/C
йăпар/AE
йăраналлă/E
йăхлă/E
йĕкĕреш/B
йĕкĕрешлĕн/C
йĕкĕрлĕ/F
йĕклĕ/F
йĕмпĕлчĕк/F
йĕнерчĕклĕ/F
йĕп/B
йĕпселлĕ/F
йĕрĕнчĕклĕ/F
йĕрĕнӳллĕн/C
йĕрлĕ/F
йĕрлешӳ/B
йĕслĕ/F
йодлă/E
йӳççĕн/C
йӳçĕнчĕк/F
йӳçенкĕллĕн/C
йӳçлĕхлĕ/F
йӳнеçӳ/B
йӳнейлĕ/F
йӳрĕккĕн/C
йӳрĕнчĕк/FG
кăвăрчлă/E
кăкăрлă/E
кăмăркка/E
кăнăçсăр/E
кăпка/E
кăпчанкăллă/E
кăрккаллă/E
кăтăркаллă/E
кăчăрка/E
кĕççеллĕ/F
кĕçмек/F
кĕçнерни/B
кĕвĕçсĕр/F
кĕвелĕксĕр/F
кĕлемеллĕ/F
кĕлетке/B
кĕлетлĕ/F
кĕмĕрккен/C
кĕмĕшке/F
кĕпçеллĕ/F
кĕпĕрне/B
кĕрĕклĕ/F
кĕреллĕ/F
кĕренӳллĕн/C
кĕрепук/B
кĕрет/F
кĕрлек/F
кĕрнеклĕн/C
кĕрнексĕр/F
кĕрче/F
кĕрӳ/B
кĕске/F
кĕсрелле/CG
кĕсьеллĕ/F
кĕтес/B
кĕтмелле/C
кĕштĕркке/F
каçăр/E
кавринкке/B
кавычкăллă/E
калăпăшлă/E
каларăшле/C
калориллĕ/F
калпаклă/E
камели/B
кампанилле/C
канăçлă/E
канваллă/E
канифольлĕ/F
капар/E
каппипе/C
капсюллĕ/F
каптăртăк/E
каракуль/B
карданлă/E
карталлă/E
картечьлĕ/F
касăллă/E
кастрюльлĕ/F
катрака/E
кафетери/B
качама/E
кашталлă/E
квалификациллĕ/F
кив/F
кивçенле/C
килĕшлĕх/B
килĕшӳллĕн/C
килĕшӳсĕр/F
килпетсĕр/F
кинематографи/B
киревлĕ/F
кирпет/B
кислоталлă/E
кисретӳллĕ/F
кичеммĕн/C
клеш/B
клишеллĕ/F
колонкăллă/E
комбинациллĕ/F
коми/B
компиляциллĕ/F
комплектлă/E
консерваци/B
конструкциллĕ/F
контролле/C
контурлă/E
конфиденциллĕ/F
концентраци/B
крахмаллă/E
кремаци/B
кремльлĕ/F
куçăмлă/E
куклек/F
кукшаллă/E
культиваци/B
кумаллă/E
купеллĕ/E
курăс/E
курсивлă/E
кутăрлă/E
кӳкĕртлĕ/F
кӳлев/B
кӳлепеллĕ/F
кӳмеллĕ/F
кӳпĕнчĕк/F
кӳпшеке/F
кӳренӳллĕн/C
кӳршĕлĕх/F
лăкă/AE
лăкăрти/B
лăпăркка/E
лăсăллă/E
лĕкĕллĕ/F
лĕнчĕркке/F
лĕпĕс/F
лĕпшенкĕ/F
лĕштĕркке/F
лавлă/E
лактаци/B
лампăркка/E
лапрака/AE
лапшака/E
лафетлă/E
лаштра/E
лекцилле/C
лемсĕркке/F
лени/B
лепĕркке/F
леререххĕн/C
линзăллă/E
линиллĕ/F
локомобиль/B
лояльноçлă/E
мăка/HE
мăкши/F
мăнкăмăллă/E
мăшăлт/E
мĕн/B
мĕреслĕ/F
мĕскĕнле/CG
майĕпен/C
майлă/E
малтанхилле/C
мама/IE
ман/HD
манерлĕ/F
манипуляци/B
массăллă/E
материлле/CG
меланхоли/B
меллĕ/C
мелсĕррĕн/C
месерле/C
меслетлĕ/F
металлă/E
металловедени/B
мещенле/CG
микрофотокопи/B
милетлĕ/F
мимикăллă/E
мирлĕн/C
мичĕт/B
мишерле/CG
моделлĕ/F
монокультураллă/E
мукки/B
мультипликациллĕ/F
мухмăрлă/E
нăкă/E
наказани/B
натриллĕ/F
нацилле/CG
неврозлă/E
неккес/F
непĕс/B
нимĕрле/CG
номерлĕ/F
нутри/B
нучка/E
нӳслĕ/F
обывателле/C
окружени/B
органикăллă/E
официаллă/E
пăрçĕмрен/B
пăрăçлă/E
пăтрануллă/E
пăчаллă/E
пĕлĕтле/C
пĕлĕтсĕр/B
пĕлĕшлĕ/F
пĕренеллĕ/F
пĕркĕт/B
пĕрлешӳллĕ/F
пĕрлешӳллĕн/C
пĕрпекле/CG
пĕртем/F
пĕрчĕк/B
пĕчĕк/F
пĕчĕкрен/C
паçник/B
пайталлă/E
панцирлĕ/F
парăмлă/E
партконференци/B
пархатарлă/E
пахалăхлă/E
пелтек/FB
пенси/B
перекетлĕн/C
пиçĕк/F
пиçĕлĕх/B
пиллĕклĕ/F
пиллĕхсĕр/B
пилсĕррĕн/C
пирчев/F
пичет/B
планлă/E
пломбăллă/E
политэкономи/B
полифониллĕ/F
популярлă/E
поршеньлĕ/F
православи/B
преступленилле/CG
привилегиллĕ/F
примитивлă/E
прогреслă/E
проекци/B
профессиллĕ/F
пуçлă/E
пукане/B
пурлă/E
путеке/B
путишле/CG
путлăхлă/E
пыйтлă/E
пӳлĕ/F
пӳре/B
пӳрлешкеллĕ/F
пӳскелле/C
радиоастрономи/B
разрядлă/E
ратнеллĕ/F
реабилитаци/B
ревматизмлă/E
реквизици/B
рекомендациллĕ/F
рекордлă/E
ретлĕн/C
ретне/F
ретрансляци/B
речитативлă/E
сăвайлă/E
сăнарлă/E
сăран/AE
сĕвек/F
сĕлĕх/B
сĕлкĕшлĕ/F
сĕмсĕррĕн/C
сĕре/F
сĕтев/B
сĕткенлĕ/F
сĕтле/C
савăклă/E
сакăлталлă/E
самсаллă/E
сан/D
санкци/B
сарказмлă/E
сваркăллă/E
сейĕрле/C
селĕм/F
селĕппĕн/C
сентел/GB
сивĕ/F
сивĕреххĕн/C
сивлеккĕн/C
сигнализаци/B
сиктерчĕклĕ/F
сикчевлĕн/C
силленчĕк/B
символлă/E
синкеррĕн/C
синхрониллĕ/F
сиплев/B
сисĕмлĕн/C
сисмесле/C
скандаллă/E
сменăллă/E
согласовани/B
содержаниллĕ/F
специализациле/CG
спорăллă/E
станкостроени/B
стиллĕ/F
структурăллă/E
студи/B
сулăмлăн/JE
сулчăн/E
сурьма/E
суффиксаци/B
сывлăмлă/E
сыхчуллă/E
сӳнмесле/C
сӳрекке/B
тăкă/E
тăмат/E
тăпăрка/E
тăрак/E
тăрилле/C
тăсланкă/JE
тĕвĕллĕ/F
тĕкĕ/B
тĕлĕнмелле/C
тĕлĕшшĕн/C
тĕлсĕррĕн/C
тĕмеске/B
тĕмсĕр/F
тĕппĕн/C
тĕпсĕр/B
тĕпчевлĕн/C
тĕрĕллĕ/F
тĕреклĕн/C
тĕреклĕх/B
тĕс/B
тĕсевлĕ/F
тĕссĕррĕн/C
тĕттĕмле/CG
тавçăруллă/E
такăнчăклă/E
танлă/E
татти/B
тахтăр/E
теçĕл/F
теветкелле/C
телеуправлени/B
теорилле/C
территориллĕ/F
тертлен/B
тивĕçлĕн/C
тик/B
тикĕссĕн/C
тикĕтлĕ/F
тинкерлĕн/CG
типĕлле/C
типлĕ/F
типологи/B
типтерлĕн/CG
тирлĕ/F
тирпей/B
тирпейлĕн/C
тискеррĕн/C
торпедăллă/E
трагедилле/CG
транскрипци/B
тувинла/C
тулашуллă/E
тумтирлĕ/F
турталлă/E
тытăнчăклă/E
тытни/B
тӳнтерле/CG
тӳпенелле/C
тӳпкелешӳ/B
тӳреммĕн/C
тӳрмен/F
тӳррĕн/C
тӳртĕнле/C
тӳсĕмлĕн/C
тӳшек/B
узурпациле/CG
уламас/E
упăтелле/CG
ураççи/B
урлă/E
фальсификациле/CG
фантазилĕх/B
фантазиллĕ/F
фасонлă/E
фильтраци/B
фразеологилле/C
хăвăрт/E
хăйĕнни/B
хăрăклă/E
хĕвелĕн/C
хĕвелле/C
хĕлĕн/C
хĕлĕхлĕ/F
хĕмлĕн/C
хĕн/B
хĕрĕнкĕ/F
хĕреслĕн/C
хĕрхев/B
хĕрхенчĕклĕн/C
хĕрхӳ/F
хĕрӳллĕн/C
хайлаллă/E
халичченхи/C
харти/B
хатĕррĕн/C
хиндилле/C
хир/GB
хисеплĕ/F
хисеплĕн/C
хозрасчётлă/E
хуллен/C
хуплă/E
хутламлă/E
хӳтлĕхсĕр/B
центральнăй/E
цивилизациллĕ/F
чăтăмлă/E
чĕлхесĕр/B
чĕмсĕррĕн/C
чĕрĕ/F
чĕррĕн/C
чĕтренӳ/B
чармашка/E
чее/F
черетлĕн/C
чикĕм/B
чипер/F
чыслă/E
шăнăрлă/E
шăрчахлă/E
шĕвĕр/F
шĕвек/B
шĕвекле/CG
шалашкаллă/E
шатраллă/E
швитски/F
шетник/B
шиклĕн/C
шикленчĕклĕ/F
шикленчĕклĕн/C
шликкелле/CG
штрихлă/E
шуранка/E
щёткăллă/E
ырханкка/E
ытахаллĕн/C
ытлашшипех/C
эволюци/B
экемет/FB
электронлă/E
эмбриологи/B
эмеллĕ/F
эмпирилле/C
эрехле/CG
эскалаци/B
эсрелле/CG
юнавлă/E
юплĕ/F
юханлă/E
яланхилле/C
ямпăлкка/E
ясаклă/E
ӳлĕмхи/C
ӳлексе/B
ӳпкелешӳллĕ/F
ӳппĕн/C
ӳркевлĕн/C
ӳсĕмлĕн/C
ӳтлĕ/F
